Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-232
Joint agreements; specific performance authorized.

Specific performance of the provisions of any joint agreement entered into as provided for in sections 3-221 to 3-231 may be enforced as against any party thereto by the other party or parties thereto.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 11(12), p. 168.